Utah statutes.
48-2a-704.   Right of assignee to become limited partner.

(1)  An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that:

(a)  the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement and the conditions set forth in the partnership agreement are met; or

(b)  all other partners consent.

(2)  An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this chapter.  An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of his assignor to make and return contributions as provided in Articles V and VI of this chapter.  However, the assignee is not obligated for any other liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time he became a limited partner.

(3)  If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his liability to the limited partnership under Sections 48-2a-207, 48-2a-502, and 48-2a-608.

